Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.310

Qualifications of receivers—Bond.

A receiver shall in all cases be a citizen of the United States or a corporation for profit authorized to act as receiver, which corporation may be a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, and shall in all cases give such bond as the court may direct with such sureties as the court may require.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 62.]